Utah statutes.
32B-4-209.   Lawful detention.

(1) (a)  To inform a peace officer of a suspected violation and subject to the requirements of Subsection (1)(c), a person described in Subsection (1)(b) may:

(i)  detain a person; and

(ii)  hold any form of identification presented by the person.

(b)  The following may take an action described in Subsection (1)(a):

(i)  a state store employee;

(ii)  a package agent;

(iii)  a licensee or permittee;

(iv)  a beer retailer; or

(v)  staff of a person described in Subsections (1)(b)(ii) through (iv).

(c)  A person described in Subsection (1)(b) may take an action described in Subsection (1)(a) only:

(i)  if that person has reason to believe that the person against whom the action is taken is:

(A)  in a facility where liquor or beer is sold; and

(B)  in violation of Section 32B-4-409, 32B-4-412, or 32B-4-413;

(ii)  in a reasonable manner; and

(iii)  for a reasonable length of time.

(2)  Unless the detention is unreasonable under all circumstances, the detention or failure to detain does not create criminal or civil liability for:

(a)  false arrest;

(b)  false imprisonment;

(c)  slander; or

(d)  unlawful detention.

